California statutes. Labor Code
-------------------------------------------

512.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including applicable wage orders, the requirement to provide a meal or rest period pursuant to an applicable statute, regulation, ordinance, standard, or order shall not apply to an airline cabin crew employee if the employee meets either of the following conditions:

(1) The employee
 is covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement under the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.) and that agreement contains any provision addressing meal and rest periods for airline cabin crew employees.

(2) The employee is
 part of a craft or class of employees that is represented by a labor organization pursuant to the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.) but is not yet covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement described in paragraph (1). This paragraph shall apply for the first 12 months that the craft or class of employees is represented by a labor organization and may apply for longer than the first 12 months
 only if agreed upon in writing by the employer and the labor organization representing the employee’s craft or class.

(b) For purposes of this section, a collective bargaining agreement “contains any provision addressing meal and rest periods” if the agreement contains any provision providing for meal and rest periods; providing compensation in lieu of meals, or per diem, which may be in lieu of meals; or providing a recognition of a right to eat on board an aircraft during the course of a duty day.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing December 5,
 2022, a person shall not file a new legal action by or on behalf of a person covered by a collective bargaining agreement meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) asserting a claim for alleged meal or rest break violations.

(d) This section shall not affect a settlement agreement or final judgment of any civil action brought by an airline cabin crew employee, or class thereof, against an employer on a claim of a meal or rest break violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 2, Sec. 1.   (SB 41)   Effective March 23, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

512.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, if the Industrial Welfare Commission adopts or amends an order that applies to an employee of a public agency who operates a commercial motor vehicle, it may exempt that employee from the application of the provisions of that order which relate to meal periods or rest periods, consistent with the health and welfare of that employee, if he or she is covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement.

(b) “Commercial motor vehicle” for the purposes of this section has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 15210 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “Public agency” for the purposes of this section means the state and any political subdivision of the state, including any city, county, city and county, or special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

If an employer approves a written request of an employee to make up work time that is or would be lost as a result of a personal obligation of the employee, the hours of that makeup work time, if performed in the same workweek in which the work time was lost, may not be counted towards computing the total number of hours worked in a day for purposes of the overtime requirements specified in Section 510 or 511, except for hours in excess of 11 hours of work in one day or 40 hours in one workweek. An employee shall provide a signed written request for each occasion that the employee makes a request to make up work time pursuant to this section. An employer is prohibited from encouraging or otherwise soliciting an employee to request the employer’s approval to take personal time off and make up the work hours within the same week pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 134, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

514.

Sections 510 and 511 do not apply to an employee covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of the employees, and if the agreement provides premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked and a regular hourly rate of pay for those employees of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

514.5.

(a) Sections 510, 511, and 512 do not apply to a person who is covered by a contract to play baseball at the minor league level with a labor organization that has at least 10 years of experience representing baseball players and who is compensated pursuant to the terms of a valid collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages, hours of work,
 working conditions of employees, payment for time worked during the off-season and spring training, and final and binding arbitration of disputes.

(b) (1) By three months after the effective date of this section, the Department of Industrial Relations shall amend and republish Wage Order No. 10-2001 to provide that Sections 3 to 7, inclusive, and Sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of the wage order do not apply to a person subject to this section.

(2) An amendment and republication pursuant to this section are exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code), and from the procedures described in Sections 1177, 1178.5, 1181, 1182, and 1182.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 866, Sec. 2.   (SB 332)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

(a) The Industrial Welfare Commission may establish exemptions from the requirement that an overtime rate of compensation be paid pursuant to Sections 510 and 511 for executive, administrative, and professional employees, if the employee is primarily engaged in the duties that meet the test of the exemption, customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment in performing those duties, and earns a monthly salary equivalent to no less than two times the state minimum wage for full-time employment. The commission shall conduct a review of the duties that meet the test of the exemption. The commission may, based upon this review, convene a public hearing to adopt or modify regulations at that hearing pertaining to duties that meet the test of the exemption without convening
 wage boards. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be concluded not later than July 1, 2000.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in subdivision (g) of Section 511, nothing in this section requires the commission to alter an exemption from provisions regulating hours of work that was contained in a valid wage order in effect in 1997. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the commission may review, retain, or eliminate an exemption from provisions regulating hours of work that was contained in a valid wage order in effect in 1997.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a), “full-time employment” means employment in which an employee is employed for 40 hours
 per week.

(d) (1) For the purpose of computing the overtime rate of compensation required to be paid to a nonexempt full-time salaried employee, the employee’s regular hourly rate shall be140th of the employee’s weekly salary.

(2) Payment of a fixed salary to a nonexempt employee shall be deemed to provide compensation only for the employee’s regular, nonovertime hours, notwithstanding any private agreement to the contrary.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “primarily” means more than one-half of the employee’s worktime.

(f) (1) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), a registered
 nurse employed to engage in the practice of nursing shall not be exempted from coverage under the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, unless he or she individually meets the criteria for exemptions established for executive or administrative employees.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any of the following:

(A) A certified nurse midwife who is primarily engaged in performing duties for which certification is required pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) A certified nurse anesthetist who is primarily engaged in performing duties for which certification is required pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 2825) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) A certified nurse practitioner who is primarily engaged in performing duties for which certification is required pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) Nothing in this paragraph shall exempt the occupations set forth in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) from meeting the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 820, Sec. 2.   (AB 2103)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

515.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an employee in the computer software field shall be exempt from the requirement that an overtime rate of compensation be paid pursuant to Section 510 if all of the following apply:

(1) The employee is primarily engaged in work that is intellectual or creative and that requires the exercise of discretion and independent judgment.

(2) The employee is primarily engaged in duties that consist of one or more of the following:

(A) The application of systems analysis techniques and procedures, including consulting with
 users, to determine hardware, software, or system functional specifications.

(B) The design, development, documentation, analysis, creation, testing, or modification of computer systems or programs, including prototypes, based on and related to user or system design specifications.

(C) The documentation, testing, creation, or modification of computer programs related to the design of software or hardware for computer operating systems.

(3) The employee is highly skilled and is proficient in the theoretical and practical application of highly specialized information to computer systems analysis, programming, or software engineering. A job title shall not be determinative of the applicability of this exemption.

(4) The employee’s hourly rate of pay is not
 less than thirty-six dollars ($36.00) or, if the employee is paid on a salaried basis, the employee earns an annual salary of not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for full-time employment, which is paid at least once a month and in a monthly amount of not less than six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250). The department shall adjust both the hourly pay rate and the salary level described in this paragraph on October 1 of each year to be effective on January 1 of the following year by an amount equal to the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers.

(b) The exemption provided in subdivision (a) does not apply to an employee if any of the following apply:

(1) The employee is a trainee or employee in an entry-level position who is learning to become proficient in the theoretical and practical
 application of highly specialized information to computer systems analysis, programming, and software engineering.

(2) The employee is in a computer-related occupation but has not attained the level of skill and expertise necessary to work independently and without close supervision.

(3) The employee is engaged in the operation of computers or in the manufacture, repair, or maintenance of computer hardware and related equipment.

(4) The employee is an engineer, drafter, machinist, or other professional whose work is highly dependent upon or facilitated by the use of computers and computer software programs and who is skilled in computer-aided design software, including CAD/CAM, but who is not engaged in computer systems analysis, programming, or any other similarly skilled computer-related occupation.

(5) The employee is a writer engaged in writing material, including box labels, product descriptions, documentation, promotional material, setup and installation instructions, and other similar written information, either for print or for onscreen media or who writes or provides content material intended to be read by customers, subscribers, or visitors to computer-related media such as the World Wide Web or CD-ROMs.

(6) The employee is engaged in any of the activities set forth in subdivision (a) for the purpose of creating imagery for effects used in the motion picture, television, or theatrical industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 89.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

515.6.

(a) Section 510 shall not apply to any employee who is a licensed physician or surgeon, who is primarily engaged in duties that require licensure pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and whose hourly rate of pay is equal to or greater than fifty-five dollars ($55.00). The department shall adjust this threshold rate of pay each October 1, to be effective the following January 1, by an amount equal to the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers.

(b) The exemption provided in subdivision (a) shall not apply to an employee employed in a medical internship or
 resident program or to a physician employee covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement pursuant to Section 514.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 90.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

515.7.

(a) If an employee is employed to provide instruction for a course or laboratory at an independent institution of higher education, the employee shall be classified as employed in a professional capacity under Wage Order No. 4-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission, or under Wage Order No. 5-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and shall be exempt from paragraphs (2), (3), and (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 226, and Sections 510 and 512, when all of the following apply:

(1) The employee is employed in a professional capacity. For the purpose of this section, an employee shall be considered to be employed in a professional capacity under Wage Order No. 4-2001 or Wage Order No. 5-2001, notwithstanding clauses (a) and (d) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph
 (A) of Section 1 of Wage Order 4 and clauses (a) and (d) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (B) of Section 1 of Wage Order 5, if:

(A) The employee is primarily engaged in an occupation commonly recognized as a learned or artistic profession; and

(B) The employee customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment in the performance of duties set forth in subparagraph (A).

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “learned or artistic profession” means an employee who is primarily engaged in the performance of:

(i) Work requiring knowledge of an advanced type in a field or science or learning customarily acquired by a prolonged course of specialized intellectual instruction and study, as distinguished from a general academic education and
 from an apprenticeship, and from training in the performance of routine mental, manual, or physical processes, or work that is an essential part of or necessarily incident to any of the above work; or

(ii) Work that is original and creative in character in a recognized field of artistic endeavor, as opposed to work which can be produced by a person endowed with general manual or intellectual ability and training, and the result of which depends primarily on the invention, imagination, or talent of the employee or work that is an essential part of or necessarily incident to any of the above work; and

(iii) Whose work is predominantly intellectual and varied in character, as opposed to routine mental, manual, mechanical, or physical work, and is of such character that the output produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in relation to a given period of time.

(2) The employee is paid on a salary basis, as defined by Section 541.602 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and receives one of the following minimum compensations:

(A) A monthly salary equivalent to no less than two times the state minimum wage for employment in which the employee is employed for at least 40 hours per week.

(B) When employed per course or laboratory, a salary for a course or laboratory that is calculated on the basis of classroom hours as set forth in subdivision (b).

(C) When employed under a collective bargaining agreement, payment pursuant to that collective bargaining agreement, if the classification of employment in a professional capacity is expressly included in the collective bargaining agreement in clear and
 unambiguous terms. The requirements of Section 514 that mandate provisions of a collective bargaining agreement shall not apply.

(b) The minimum salary required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be calculated using classroom hours as follows:

(1) The minimum payment that is calculated using classroom hours shall encompass payment for all classroom or laboratory time, preparation, grading, office hours, and other course- or laboratory-related work for that course or laboratory and no separate payment shall be required. The following minimum rates shall be used in this calculation:

(A) For each classroom hour in 2020: one hundred seventeen dollars ($117).

(B) For each classroom hour in 2021: one hundred twenty-six dollars
 ($126).

(C) For each classroom hour in 2022: one hundred thirty-five dollars ($135).

(D) For each classroom hour in 2023 and each year thereafter: a percentage increase to the rate described in subparagraph (C) that is equal to the percentage increase to the state minimum wage calculated in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 1182.12.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a laboratory, art studio course, clinical course, or other nonlecture course has more classroom hours than a lecture-based course with the same number of units at the institution, the minimum salary required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for the laboratory, art studio course, clinical course, or other nonlecture course shall be that of the lecture-based course with the same number of units.

(3) The minimum rate of pay for per course or laboratory compensation is for course-related work only. Employees shall be compensated separately for other non-course-related work on behalf of the employer, which shall not affect the employee’s classification as an exempt employee.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Classroom hour” means the time spent in the primary forum of the course or laboratory, regardless of whether the forum is inperson or virtual.

(2) “Independent institution of higher education” means a nonpublic, higher education institution that grants undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that is formed as a nonprofit corporation before January 1, 2023, and is accredited by an agency
 recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 3105)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

515.8.

(a) Section 510 does not apply to an individual employed as a teacher at a private elementary or secondary academic institution in which pupils are enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) For purposes of this section, “employed as a teacher” means that the employee meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The employee is primarily engaged in the duty of imparting knowledge to pupils by teaching, instructing, or lecturing.

(2) The employee customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment in performing the duties of a teacher.

(3) On and after July 1, 2017, the employee earns the
 following amount:

(A) For a full-time employee, the greater of the following:

(i) No less than 100 percent of the lowest salary offered by any school district to a person who is in a position that requires the person to have a valid California teaching credential and is not employed in that position pursuant to an emergency permit, intern permit, or waiver.

(ii) The equivalent of no less than 70 percent of the lowest schedule salary offered by the school district or the county office of education in which the private elementary or secondary academic institution is located to a person who is in a position that requires the person to have a valid California teaching credential and is not employed in that position pursuant to an emergency permit, intern permit, or waiver.

(B) For a part-time employee, the proportional amount of the salary
 identified in subparagraph (A) that is equal to the proportion of the full-time instructional schedule for which the part-time employee is employed.

(4) The employee has attained at least one of the following levels of professional advancement:

(A) A baccalaureate or higher degree from an accredited institution of higher education.

(B) Current compliance with the requirements established by the California Commission on Teacher Credentialing, or the equivalent certification authority in another state, for obtaining a preliminary or alternative teaching credential.

(c) When budgeting for a future school year, a private elementary or secondary
 academic institution may determine the salary requirements in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) by referring to school salary schedules in effect for up to 12 months prior to the start of the school year.

(d) This section does not apply to any tutor, teaching assistant, instructional aide, student teacher, day care provider, vocational instructor, or other similar employee.

(e) The exemption established in subdivision (a) is in addition to, and does not limit or supersede, any exemption from overtime established by a Wage Order of the Industrial Welfare Commission for persons employed in a professional capacity, and does not affect any exemption from overtime established by that commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 515 for persons employed in an executive or administrative capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   (SB 621)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

(a) Except as provided in Section 512, the Industrial Welfare Commission may adopt or amend working condition orders with respect to break periods, meal periods, and days of rest for any workers in California consistent with the health and welfare of those workers.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), or any other law, including Section 512, the health care employee meal period waiver provisions in Section 11(D) of Industrial Welfare Commission Wage Orders 4 and 5 were valid and enforceable on and after October 1, 2000, and continue to be valid and enforceable. This subdivision is declarative of, and clarifies, existing
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   (SB 327)   Effective October 5, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

517.

(a) The Industrial Welfare Commission shall, at a public hearing to be concluded by July 1, 2000, adopt wage, hours, and working conditions orders consistent with this chapter without convening wage boards, which orders shall be final and conclusive for all purposes. These orders shall include regulations necessary to provide assurances of fairness regarding the conduct of employee workweek elections, procedures for employees to petition for and obtain elections to repeal alternative workweek schedules, procedures for implementation of those schedules, conditions under which an adopted alternative workweek schedule can be repealed by the employer, employee disclosures, designations of work, and processing of workweek election petitions pursuant to Parts 2 and 4 of this division and in any wage order of the commission and such other regulations as may be needed to fulfill the duties of the commission pursuant to this part.

(b) Prior to July 1, 2000, the Industrial Welfare Commission shall conduct a review of wages, hours, and working conditions in the ski industry, commercial fishing industry, and health care industry, and for stable employees in the horseracing industry. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Sections 510 and 511, and consistent with its duty to protect the health, safety, and welfare of workers pursuant to Section 1173, the commission may, based upon this review, convene a public hearing to adopt or modify regulations at that hearing pertaining to the industries herein, without convening wage boards. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be concluded not later than July 1, 2000.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 515, prior to July 1, 2000, the commission shall conduct a review of wages, hours, and working conditions of licensed pharmacists. The commission may, based upon this review, convene a public hearing to adopt or modify regulations at that hearing pertaining to licensed pharmacists without convening wage boards. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be concluded not later than July 1, 2000.

(d) Notwithstanding sections 1171 and subdivision (a) of Section 515, the Industrial Welfare Commission shall conduct a review of wages, hours, and working conditions of outside salespersons. The commission may, based upon this review, convene a public hearing to adopt or modify regulations at that hearing pertaining to outside salespersons without convening wage boards. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be concluded not later than July 1, 2000.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to restrict the Industrial Welfare Commission in its continuing duties pursuant to Section 1173.

(f) No action taken by the Industrial Welfare Commission pursuant to this section is subject to the requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) All wage orders and other regulations issued or adopted pursuant to this section shall be published in accordance with Section 1182.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 134, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

550.

As used in this chapter “day’s rest” applies to all situations whether the employee is engaged by the day, week, month, or year, and whether the work performed is done in the day or night time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

Every person employed in any occupation of labor is entitled to one day’s rest therefrom in seven.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

No employer of labor shall cause his employees to work more than six days in seven.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

Any person who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

(a) Sections 551 and 552 do not apply to cases of emergency or to work performed in the protection of life or property from loss or destruction, or to any common carrier engaged in or connected with the movement of trains. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent an accumulation of days of rest when the nature of the employment reasonably requires that the employee work seven or more consecutive days, if in each calendar month the employee receives days of rest equivalent to one day’s rest in seven. The requirement respecting the equivalent of one day’s rest in seven shall apply, notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter relating to collective bargaining agreements, where the employer and
 a labor organization representing employees of the employer have entered into a valid collective bargaining agreement respecting the hours of work of the employees, unless the agreement expressly provides otherwise.

(b) In addition to the exceptions specified in subdivision (a), the Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement may, when in his or her judgment hardship will result, exempt any employer or employees from the provisions of Sections 551 and 552.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

Sections 550, 551, 552 and 554 of this chapter are applicable to cities which are cities and counties and to the officers and employees thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

556.

Sections 551 and 552 shall not apply to any employer or employee when the total hours of employment do not exceed 30 hours in any week or six hours in any one day thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 134, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

(a) Any employer or other person acting on behalf of an employer who violates, or causes to be violated, a section of this chapter or any provision regulating hours and days of work in any order of the Industrial Welfare Commission shall be subject to a civil penalty as follows:

(1) For any initial violation, fifty dollars ($50) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which the employee was underpaid in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid wages.

(2) For each subsequent violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which
 the employee was underpaid in addition to an amount sufficient to
 recover underpaid wages.

(3) Wages recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the affected employee.

(b) If upon inspection or investigation the Labor Commissioner determines that a person had paid or caused to be paid a wage for overtime work in violation of any provision of this chapter, any provision regulating hours and days of work in any order of the Industrial Welfare Commission, or any applicable local overtime law, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations or civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner for a violation of this chapter shall be the same as those set out in Section 1197.1.

(c) In a
 jurisdiction where a local entity has the legal authority to issue a citation against an employer for a violation of any applicable local overtime law, the Labor Commissioner, pursuant to a request from the local entity, may issue a citation against an employer for a violation of any applicable local overtime law if the local entity has not cited the employer for the same violation. If the Labor Commissioner issues a citation, the local entity shall not cite the employer for the same violation.

(d) The civil penalties provided for in this section are in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty provided by law.

(e) This
 section
 does not change the applicability of local overtime wage laws to any entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

558.1.

(a) Any employer or other person acting on behalf of an employer, who violates, or causes to be violated, any provision regulating minimum wages or hours and days of work in any order of the Industrial Welfare Commission, or violates, or causes to be violated, Sections 203, 226, 226.7, 1193.6, 1194, or 2802, may be held liable as the employer for such violation.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “other person acting on behalf of an employer” is limited to a natural person who is an owner, director, officer, or managing agent of the employer, and the term “managing agent” has the same meaning as in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the definition of employer under existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 803, Sec. 10.   (SB 588)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Railroads [600. - 607.]

600.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates:

(a) “Railroad” means any steam railroad, electric railroad, or railway, operated in whole or in part in this State.

(b) “Railroad corporation” means a corporation or receiver operating a railroad.

(c) “Trainman” means a conductor, motorman, engineer, fireman, brakeman, train dispatcher, or telegraph operator, employed by or working in connection with a railroad.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

No railroad corporation or any officer, agent or representative of such corporation shall require or knowingly permit any trainman to be on duty for a longer period than 12 consecutive hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

602.

Whenever any trainman has been continuously on duty for 12 hours he shall be relieved and not required or permitted again to go on duty or perform any work for the railroad corporation until he has had at least 10 consecutive hours off duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 896, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

No trainman who has been on duty 12 hours in the aggregate in any 24-hour period shall be required or permitted to continue or again go on duty without having had at least 8 consecutive hours off duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 896, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

No person who by the use of the telegraph or telephone, dispatches, reports, transmits, receives or delivers orders pertaining to or affecting train movements shall be required or permitted to be on duty for a longer period than nine hours in any twenty-four hours, in towers, offices, places and stations continuously operated night and day, nor for a longer period than thirteen hours in towers, offices, places and stations operated only during the daytime. In case of emergency, however, the persons referred to in this section may be permitted to be on duty for four additional hours in a twenty-four hour period. Such additional duty shall not be required or permitted on more than three days in any week.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

Any railroad corporation that violates any of the provisions of this chapter is liable to the state in a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense. The penalty shall be recovered and suit therefor shall be brought in the name of the state in a court of competent jurisdiction in any county into or through which said railroad may pass. The suit may be brought either by the Attorney General of the state or under his or her direction by the district attorney of any county in the state into or through which said railroad passes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 329, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

Any officer, agent or representative of any railroad corporation who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense, or confinement in the county jail for not less than 10 nor more than 60 days, or both. Such person so offending may be prosecuted under this section, either in the county where he is at the time of commission of the offense, or in any county where such employee has been permitted or required to work in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 193.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

This chapter shall not apply in any case of casualty, unavoidable accident, or act of God; nor where the delay was the result of a cause not known to, and which could not have been foreseen by, the railroad corporation, or its officer or agent in charge of a trainman at the time the trainman left a terminal. This chapter shall not apply to the crews of wrecking, or relief trains.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Smelters and Underground Workings [750. - 752.5.]

750.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no employee may be employed for a period that exceeds eight hours within any 24-hour period and the hours of employment of any workday shall be consecutive, excluding intermissions for meals, for all persons who are employed or engaged in work in any of the following:

(1) Underground mines.

(2) Smelters and plants for the reduction or refining of ores or metals.

(b) No provision of this chapter applies to quarries or other operations for the extraction of nonmetallic minerals, including, but not limited to, sand, gravel, and rock.

(c) No provision of this chapter applies to an employee who is employed in an executive, administrative, or professional capacity, or employed as an outside salesperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

750.5.

Notwithstanding Section 750, an employee may be employed for a period that exceeds eight hours within a 24-hour period, under the circumstances specified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), as follows:

(a) If the employer and a labor organization representing employees of the employer have entered into a valid collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of the employees.

(b) If a two-thirds majority of the affected employees of that employer whose hours are regulated by this chapter have voted in an election to adopt a policy that specifies periods of work that may exceed eight hours in a 24-hour period, and the employer adopts that policy, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The agreement adopted with respect to that policy reflects the results of the election.

(2) The election is conducted, at the expense of the employer, with the use of secret ballots, during regular working hours. Upon the written request of an employee to his or her employer, or to the Labor Commissioner, made no later than 10 days prior to the date set for the election, the employer shall cause the election to be conducted by a neutral third party with experience in conducting employee elections. If such a written request is made to the commissioner pursuant to this paragraph, the commissioner shall not disclose the identity of the employee and shall notify the employer, no later than five days prior to the date set for the election, that the election is required to be conducted by a neutral third party. Such an election may be conducted by utilizing mail ballots.
